Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 8. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 42.45.400.
[Renumbered as AS 42.45.900.]

Sec. 42.45.410.
[Renumbered as AS 42.45.910.]

Sec. 42.45.900.
Assistance to rural utilities.

The authority shall provide technical assistance to rural utilities including catastrophe prevention programs and other training programs for utility projects. The authority shall provide rural utilities with the technical assistance and training that the utilities need to improve the efficiency, safety, and reliability of their power systems and to prevent emergency situations from developing. At a minimum, the assistance and training must include information on

reducing distribution line losses;

installation of generators that are more fuel efficient;

preventative maintenance programs;

safety inspections;

installing and maintaining waste heat systems;

improved metering systems;

improved management and administration; and

coordinating regional activities, including circuit rider maintenance programs.

In providing rural utilities with technical assistance and training, the authority shall give priority to contracting with the private sector for these services.

This section does not create a duty in tort, and may not be the basis for an action against the state, the authority, or the officers, employees, agents, or contractors of either for damages, injury, or death.

History.

(§ 5 ch 18 SLA 1993; am § 8 ch 36 SLA 2004)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

42.45.400

. Renumbered in 2010.

In 1999, in this section, “department” was changed to “authority” in accordance with § 91(b), ch. 58, SLA 1999.

Administrative Code. —

For circuit rider maintenance and electrical emergencies programs, see 3 AAC 108, art. 2.

Sec. 42.45.910.
Relationship with private sector.

The authority shall, to the maximum extent feasible, carry out its powers and duties under this chapter by entering into contracts with appropriate entities in the private sector.

History.

(§ 5 ch 18 SLA 1993)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS

42.45.410

. Renumbered in 2010.

In 1999, in this section, “department” was changed to “authority” in accordance with § 91(b), ch. 58, SLA 1999.